District of Columbia statutes.
34-1312.06

Financing and closing documents.

(a)

The Mayor is authorized to prescribe the final form and content of all financing documents and all closing documents that may be necessary or appropriate to issue, sell, and deliver the Bonds.

(b)

The Mayor is authorized to execute the financing documents and any closing documents by the Mayor’s manual or facsimile signature.

(c)

The Mayor’s execution and delivery of the financing documents and the closing documents to which the District is a party shall constitute conclusive evidence of the Mayor’s approval of the final form and content of the executed financing documents and the executed closing documents.

(d)

The Mayor is authorized to deliver the executed and sealed financing documents and closing documents before or simultaneously with the issuance, sale, and delivery of the Bonds and to ensure the due performance of the obligations contained in the executed, sealed, and delivered financing documents and closing documents.

History

May 3, 2014, D.C. Law 20-102, § 206, 61 DCR 1882